incubator/apertium-pl-sk/dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="ďat/eľ__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eľa</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľa</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eľovi</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľovi</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eľa</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľa</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eľovi</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľovi</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eľ</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eľom</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľom</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eľ</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eľov</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľov</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eľom</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľom</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ele</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eľoch</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľoch</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ele</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eľmi</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľami</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ele</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>eľ<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diváky__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lump__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ov</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ov</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>och</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ami</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="človiečik__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ov</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ov</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>och</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovia</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovia</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pamä/ti__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tí</l>
        <r>ti<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ti<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="pamä/ti__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="diváky"><i>diváky</i><par n="diváky__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lump"><i>lump</i><par n="lump__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pamäti"><i>pamä</i><par n="pamä/ti__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pasy"><i>pasy</i><par n="diváky__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vnútornosti"><i>vnútornos</i><par n="pamä/ti__n"/></e>
    <e lm="človiečik"><i>človiečik</i><par n="človiečik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ďateľ"><i>ďat</i><par n="ďat/eľ__n"/></e>
